Utah statutes.
53-3-221.5.   Disclosure of license information to the Office of Recovery Services.

(1)  The division shall disclose to the Office of Recovery Services the name, address, and other identifying information of each person:

(a)  to whom a license has been issued; or

(b)  whose driving privileges have been suspended, revoked, or reinstated.

(2)  All information received by the Office of Recovery Services under this section is subject to Title 63G, Chapter 2, Government Records Access and Management Act.

